Utah statutes.
78A-6-1112.   Exchange of information with agency or institution having legal custody -- Transfer of minor to state prison or other adult facility prohibited.

(1)  Whenever legal custody of a minor is vested in an institution or agency, the court shall transmit with the court order copies of the social study, any clinical reports, and other information pertinent to the care and treatment of the minor.  The institution or agency shall give the court any information concerning the minor that the court may at any time require.

(2)  The Division of Juvenile Justice Services or any other institution or agency to whom a minor is committed under Section 78A-6-117 may not transfer custody of the minor to the state prison or any other institution for the correction of adult offenders.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

